Utah statutes.
76-10-527.   Penalties.

(1)  A dealer is guilty of a class A misdemeanor who willfully and intentionally:

(a)  requests, obtains, or seeks to obtain criminal history background information under false pretenses;

(b)  disseminates criminal history background information; or

(c)  violates Section 76-10-526.

(2)  A person who purchases or transfers a firearm is guilty of a felony of the third degree if the person willfully and intentionally makes a false statement of the information required for a criminal background check in Section 76-10-526.

(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (1), a dealer is guilty of a felony of the third degree if the dealer willfully and intentionally sells or transfers a firearm in violation of this part.

(4)  A person is guilty of a felony of the third degree if the person purchases a firearm with the intent to:

(a)  resell or otherwise provide a firearm to a person who is ineligible to purchase or receive a firearm from a dealer; or

(b)  transport a firearm out of this state to be resold to an ineligible person.



Amended by Chapter 20, 2009 General Session

